Utah statutes.
54-7-23.   Penalties.

(1) This title shall not have the effect to release or waive any right of action by the state, the commission or any person for any right, penalty or forfeiture, which may have arisen or accrued or may hereafter arise or accrue under any law of this state.

(2)  All penalties accruing under this title shall be cumulative and a suit for the recovery of one penalty shall not be a bar to or affect the recovery of any other penalty or forfeiture, or be a bar to any criminal prosecution against any public utility, or any officer, director, agent or employee thereof, or any other corporation or person, or be a bar to the exercise by the commission of its power to punish for contempt.

